Utah statutes.
63G-6-812 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Discontinued appeal with prejudice, except as authorized.

After notice of an appeal to the Procurement Policy Board is filed under Section 63G-6-807, no party may discontinue the appeal without prejudice, except as authorized by the procurement appeals panel appointed for the appeal.

